test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_fadda__dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  

  Noun - lijmá:
    lijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  lijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  liijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  liijmán
    lijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  lijmáást
    lijmá+N+Sg+Com:  lijmáin
    lijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊjmáttáá
    lijmá+N+Ess:  lijmán
    lijmá+N+Par:  lijmád
    lijmá+N+Pl+Nom:  liijmáh
    lijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [liijmái, liˊjmái]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  liijmáid
    lijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  [lijmáid, liijmáid]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  liijmáin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊjmáiguin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊjmáittáá

  Noun - sijmá:
    sijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  sijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  siijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  siijmán
    sijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  sijmáást
    sijmá+N+Sg+Com:  sijmáin
    sijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊjmáttáá
    sijmá+N+Ess:  sijmán
    sijmá+N+Par:  sijmád
    sijmá+N+Pl+Nom: siijmáh
    sijmá+N+Pl+Gen: [siijmái, siˊjmái]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  siijmáid
    sijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  siijmáid, sijmáid]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  siijmáin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Com:  siˊjmáiguin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊjmáittáá

  Noun - ripá:
    ripá+N+Sg+Nom:  riˊpá
    ripá+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊvá
    ripá+N+Sg+Ill:  riˊpán
    ripá+N+Sg+Loc:  riiváást
    ripá+N+Sg+Com:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊváttáá
    ripá+N+Ess:  rippáán
    ripá+N+Par:  rippáád
    ripá+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊváh
    ripá+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊvái
    ripá+N+Pl+Acc:  riˊváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Ill:  riváid
    ripá+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊváin
    ripá+N+Pl+Com:  riˊváiguin
    ripá+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊváittáá

  Noun - hijvá:
    hijvá+N+Sg+Nom:  hijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Gen:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Acc:  hiijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Ill:  hiijván
    hijvá+N+Sg+Loc:  hijváást
    hijvá+N+Sg+Com:  hijˊváin
    hijvá+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊjváttáá
    hijvá+N+Ess:  hijván
    hijvá+N+Par:  hijvád
    hijvá+N+Pl+Nom:  hiijváh
    hijvá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiijvái, hiˊjvái]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Acc:  hiijváid
    hijvá+N+Pl+Ill:  [hiijváid, hijváid]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Loc:  hijváin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊjváiguin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊjváittáá

  Noun - káigá:
    káigá+N+Sg+Nom:  káigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Gen: kááigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Acc: kááigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Ill:  kááigán
    káigá+N+Sg+Loc:  káigáást
    káigá+N+Sg+Com:  káigáin
    káigá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊigáttáá
    káigá+N+Ess:  káigán
    káigá+N+Par: káigád
    káigá+N+Pl+Nom:  kááigáh
    káigá+N+Pl+Gen:  [kááigái, káigái]
    káigá+N+Pl+Acc:  kááigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Ill:  káigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Loc:  kááigáin
    káigá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊigáiguin
    káigá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊigáittáá

  Noun - vuáisá:
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáiˊsá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáiˊsáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáiˊsán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáiˊsád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuáisái, vuáˊisái]
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáiˊsáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊisáiguin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊisáittáá

  Noun - luvdá:
    luvdá+N+Sg+Nom:  luvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Gen:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Acc:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Ill:  luuvdán
    luvdá+N+Sg+Loc:  luuvdást
    luvdá+N+Sg+Com:  luvdáin
    luvdá+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊvdáttáá
    luvdá+N+Ess:  luvdán
    luvdá+N+Par:  luvdád
    luvdá+N+Pl+Nom: luuvdáh
    luvdá+N+Pl+Gen: [luuvdái, luˊvdái]
    luvdá+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Ill:  luvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Com:  luˊvdáiguin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊvdáittáá

  Noun - urná:
    urná+N+Sg+Nom:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊrná
    urná+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊrná
    urná+N+Sg+Ill:  uurnán
    urná+N+Sg+Loc:  urnáást
    urná+N+Sg+Com:  urnáin
    urná+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊrnáttáá
    urná+N+Ess:  urnán
    urná+N+Par: urnád
    urná+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊrnáh
    urná+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊrnái
    urná+N+Pl+Acc:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Ill:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Loc:  urnáin
    urná+N+Pl+Com:  uˊrnáiguin
    urná+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊrnáittáá

  Noun - čuhčá:
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com:  čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  čuˊvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess:  čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  [čuuvčáh, čuˊvčáh]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen:  [čuuvčái, čuˊvčái]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com:  čuˊvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  čuˊvčáittáá

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:  fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  fáˊdáttáá
    fáddá+N+Ess:  fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [fáádái, fáˊdái]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:  fáˊdáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  fáˊdáittáá

  Noun - fáddá: # á-stems
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom: fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill: fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc: fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe: fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com: fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Ess: fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom: fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: fáádái
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc: fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc: fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill: fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com: fádáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe: fádáittáá


  Noun - lággá:
    lággá+N+Sg+Nom:  lággá
    lággá+N+Sg+Gen:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Acc:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Ill:  láágán
    lággá+N+Sg+Loc:  lággáást
    lággá+N+Sg+Com:  lággáin
    lággá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊgáttáá
    lággá+N+Ess:  lággán
    lággá+N+Par: lággád
    lággá+N+Pl+Nom:  láágáh
    lággá+N+Pl+Gen:  [láágái, lágái]
    lággá+N+Pl+Acc:  láágáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Ill:  lággáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Loc:  láágáin
    lággá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊgáiguin
    lággá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊgáittáá

  Noun - vársá:
    vársá+N+Sg+Nom:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Gen:  váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Acc: váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Ill:  váársán
    vársá+N+Sg+Loc:  vársáást
    vársá+N+Sg+Com:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊrsáttáá
    vársá+N+Ess:  vársán
    vársá+N+Par: vársád
    vársá+N+Pl+Nom:  váˊrsáh
    vársá+N+Pl+Gen:  [vársái, váˊrsái]
    vársá+N+Pl+Acc:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Ill:  várˊsáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Loc:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Pl+Com:  váˊrsáiguin
    vársá+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊrsáittáá

  Noun - lássá:
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom:  lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill:  lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc:  lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com:  lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊsáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess:  lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom:  lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: [lááṣái, láṣái]
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc:  lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill:  lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc:  lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊsáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊsáittáá

  Noun - lássá: # á-stems
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom: lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill: lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc: lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com: lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe: láṣáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess: lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom: lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: lááṣái
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc: lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill: lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc: lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com: láṣáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe: láṣáittáá

  Noun - ráksá:
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom:  ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill:  rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com:  rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess:  ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávsái, ráˊvsái]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill:  rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvsáittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáḥá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáḥá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhˊháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá


  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárˊkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárˊháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárkkán
    vuárkká+N+Par: vuárkˊkád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárhái, vuáˊrhái]
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárˊháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊrháiguin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊrháittáá


  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávˊskán
    kuávská+N+Par: kuávˊskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávskái, kuáˊvskái]
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvskáiguin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvskáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhˊčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhˊčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávčái, kuáˊvčái]
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvčáittáá

  Noun - páájá:
    páájá+N+Sg+Nom:  pááj̣á
    páájá+N+Sg+Gen:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Acc:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Ill:  pááj̣án
    páájá+N+Sg+Loc:  páájást
    páájá+N+Sg+Com:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊjáttáá
    páájá+N+Ess:  pááiján
    páájá+N+Par: pááijád
    páájá+N+Pl+Nom:  páájáh
    páájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [páájái, pájái]
    páájá+N+Pl+Acc:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Ill:  [pááj̣áid, páijáid]
    páájá+N+Pl+Loc:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Pl+Com:  páˊjáiguin
    páájá+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊjáittáá

  Noun - čááná:
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom:  čááṇá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill:  čááṇán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc:  čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe:  čáˊnáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par:  čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom:  čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čáˊnái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com:  čáˊnáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe:  čáˊnáittáá
